New Jersey, session 222, S2740.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Transportation shall inspect, at least annually, all traffic signs in the State on highways under the jurisdiction of the New Jersey Department of Transportation to ensure that the traffic signs are adequately maintained and are legible and visible.  The commissioner shall keep a record of each inspection made pursuant to this section and shall submit an annual report of these records to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). b.    The Commissioner of Transportation shall establish a public awareness campaign to inform the general public about the importance of informing the New Jersey Department of Transportation that a traffic sign is missing, is not legible or visible, or is otherwise in need of maintenance.  The public awareness campaign shall include information concerning the means by which a person may report to the department that a traffic sign on a highway under the jurisdiction of the department is missing, is not legible or visible, or is otherwise in need of maintenance. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.